Hawaii statutes.
§88-103.7 Information from the State
and counties. [Section effective July 1, 2020. For section effective
until June 30, 2020, see below.] (a) To fulfill its responsibilities
under this chapter, the system shall require any department or agency of the
State or counties to furnish information to the system to carry out the
purposes of this chapter. The system shall specify the format in which the
information shall be furnished. Without limitation of the foregoing, the
system shall require that information be furnished in electronic format and
that information with respect to payroll and personnel transactions:

(1) Allocate payments, including bonuses, salary
adjustments, payments for compensatory time, and workers' compensation, to
monthly or other periods as requested by the system;

(2) Specify the purpose or nature of the payment; and

(3) Indicate any changes or errors in payments that
require correcting or updating.

(b) All departments and agencies of the State
or counties shall furnish the information required by the system pursuant to
this section in the format required by the system. The system shall notify
each department or agency of the State or counties that is required to furnish
information to the system of any change in the required format for the
information. Each department or agency shall have one hundred eighty days from
the date of the receipt of the notice of a change in the required format to
update the format in which the required information is provided to the system.

(c) If a department or agency of the State or
county fails to furnish the system with the information required pursuant to
this section in the format required by the system, the State or county shall
pay to the system, on the first day of the fiscal year following the fiscal
year in which the failure to furnish the required information occurred, an
amount equal to the employer contributions payable by the State or county,
relative to the department or agency that is not in compliance with this
section, during the fiscal year in which the failure to furnish the required
information occurred. This amount shall be applied to contributions required
under section 88-124 for the State and section 88-126 for the counties.

(d) If full payment of the amount required under
subsection (c) is not made by the State or county on the first day of the
fiscal year, then:

(1) Any unpaid amounts shall bear interest at the
rate equal to the investment yield rate assumption in effect for actuarial
valuations of the system; and

(2) Any payments received by the system for the State
or county, except for payments made pursuant to sections 88-46, 88-100, and
88-326, shall be applied first to accrued interest and then to the amount
required to be paid under subsection (c).

(e) The system may waive the requirements of
subsections (c) and (d) if the system determines, in its sole discretion, that
the failure by the department or agency to furnish the required information in
the required format is the result of an unforeseen system failure, natural
disaster, or other unforeseen event.

(f) The system shall annually submit to the
department of budget and finance and the legislature, not later than twenty
days prior to the convening of each regular session, a report that details the
following for the current fiscal year:

(1) Any department or agency of the state or counties
that failed to comply with this section; and

(2) Any amounts required to be paid under subsection
(c), including the anticipated amounts payable in the upcoming fiscal year, and
identification of any state budget programs that may be affected. [L 2008, c
41, §1; am L 2015, c 87, §1]

[§88-103.7] Information from the
State and counties. [Section effective until June 30, 2020. For
section effective July 1, 2020, see above.] To fulfill its
responsibilities under this chapter, the system may require any department or
agency of the State or counties to furnish information to the system to carry
out the purposes of this chapter. The system may specify the format in which
the information shall be furnished. Without limitation of the foregoing, the
system may require that information be furnished in electronic format and that
information with respect to payroll and personnel transactions:

(1) Allocate payments, including bonuses, salary
adjustments, payments for compensatory time, and workers' compensation, to
monthly or other periods as requested by the system; and

(2) Specify the purpose or nature of the payment. [L
2008, c 41, §1]

Note

Reports to 2016-2020 legislature on state and county
departments' and agencies' progress in complying with §88-103.7, as amended by
L 2015, c 87, by July 1, 2020. L 2015, c 87, §2.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next